Utah statutes.
19-3-108.   Powers and duties of executive secretary.

(1)  The executive director shall appoint an executive secretary, with the approval of the board, to serve under the direction of the executive director.

(2)  The executive secretary may:

(a)  develop programs to promote and protect the public from radiation sources in the state;

(b)  advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies, states, the federal government, political subdivisions, industries, and other groups to further the purposes of this chapter;

(c)  as authorized by the board:

(i)  issue licenses, registrations, and certifications;

(ii)  review and approve plans;

(iii)  enforce rules through the issuance of orders and assess penalties in accordance with Section 19-3-109;

(iv)  impound radioactive material under Section 19-3-111; and

(v)  authorize employees or representatives of the department to enter at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice in and upon public or private property for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions and records concerning radiation sources.

